North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-50 Occupational Licensee DataBase

43-50-01.
Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, “occupational or professional certificate, permit, or license” means a certificate, permit, or license issued by or on behalf of the state by any of its licensing authorities or occupational or professional boards, which an individual is required to obtain before engaging in the individual’s occupation or profession.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 49.

43-50-02.
Social security number required for professional or occupational license.

No issuer of an occupational or professional certificate, permit, or license may issue such a certificate, permit, or license, or renewal thereof, to any individual who has not first provided the individual’s social security number.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 49.

43-50-03.
Inclusion of social security number in automated database.

An issuer of an occupational or professional certificate, permit, or license, that maintains an automated database concerning individuals who have applied for or been issued a certificate, permit, or license, after July 1, 1997, must include the individual’s social security number as an identifier in that database.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 49.

43-50-04.
Social security number — Confidential.

A social security number provided under this chapter is confidential.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 49; 2003, ch. 382, § 7.